Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202083-4,126
Jail Standards Board; powers and duties; enumerated.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the Jail Standards Board shall have the authority and responsibility:

(a) To develop minimum standards for the construction, maintenance, and operation of criminal detention facilities;

(b) To perform other duties as may be necessary to carry out the policy of the state regarding criminal detention facilities, juvenile detention facilities, and staff secure juvenile facilities as stated in sections 83-4,124 to 83-4,134.02; and

(c) Consistent with the purposes and objectives of the Juvenile Services Act, to develop standards for juvenile detention facilities and staff secure juvenile facilities, including, but not limited to, standards for physical facilities, care, programs, and disciplinary procedures, and to develop guidelines pertaining to the operation of such facilities.

(2) The Jail Standards Board shall not have authority over or responsibility for correctional facilities that are accredited by a nationally recognized correctional association. A correctional facility that is accredited by a nationally recognized correctional association shall show proof of accreditation annually to the Jail Standards Board. For purposes of this subsection, nationally recognized correctional association includes, but is not limited to, the American Correctional Association or its successor.

Laws 1975, LB 417, § 28;

Laws 1978, LB 212, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 83-948;

Laws 1990, LB 663, § 17;

Laws 1992, LB 1184, § 19;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 27;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 66;

Laws 2016, LB894, § 21;

Laws 2020, LB230, § 2.

Juvenile Services Act, see section 43-2401.